Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB332.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 603 of the act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code, is amended to read:Section 603. General Primary; Candidates to Be Nominated and Party Officers to Be Elected.--(a) There shall be a General primary preceding each general election which shall be held on the third Tuesday of May in all even-numbered years, except in the year of the nomination of a President of the United States, 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 in which year the General primary shall be held on the [fourth Tuesday of April] third Tuesday of March. Candidates for all offices to be filled at the ensuing general election shall be nominated at the General primary. The vote for candidates for the office of President of the United States, as provided for by this act, shall be cast at the General primary.(b.1) Notwithstanding subsection (a), the General primary for 2000 shall be held on April 4, 2000.Section 2. The amendment of section 603 of the act shall apply beginning with the general primary election that occurs in 2028.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0332PN0301 - 2 - 123456789101112